Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 11.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201277-1011
Full-service restaurant, defined.

Full-service restaurant
means any public place (1) which is kept, used, maintained, advertised, and
held out to the public as a place where meals are served and where meals are
actually and regularly served, (2) which has no sleeping accommodations, (3)
which has adequate and sanitary kitchen and dining room equipment and capacity
and a sufficient number and kind of employees to prepare, cook, and serve
suitable food for its guests to consume on premise, and (4) which has wait
staff and table service with an average per-table bill of at least fifteen
dollars.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 11.